Illinois, session 104th, HB3906.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 1 5DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 6MULTI-MODAL OPERATIONS 7    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 9named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 10ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 11Transportation for: 12DEPARTMENT-WIDE13  For Personal Services..........................$573,994,00014   Split approximated below:15   Central Administration & Planning..............$39,503,60016   Bureau of Information Processing................$6,978,30017   Planning & Programming.........................$13,051,20018   Highway Project Implementation.................$41,472,80019   Day Labor.......................................$3,788,50020   District 1....................................$140,159,20021   District 2.....................................$38,991,40022   District 3.....................................$37,362,700  HB3906- 2 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1   District 4.....................................$39,275,3002   District 5.....................................$33,220,0003   District 6.....................................$46,460,4004   District 7.....................................$36,129,2005   District 8.....................................$54,586,9006   District 9.....................................$32,541,9007   Aeronautics.....................................$4,472,7008   Intermodal Project Implementation...............$5,999,9009  For Extra Help for Districts 1 - 9..............$41,155,00010   Split approximated below:11   District 1.....................................$11,955,00012   District 2......................................$4,550,00013   District 3......................................$3,900,00014   District 4......................................$4,300,00015   District 5......................................$2,850,00016   District 6......................................$4,200,00017   District 7......................................$2,800,00018   District 8......................................$4,000,00019   District 9......................................$2,600,00020  For State Contributions to State Employees'21   Retirement System.............................$285,958,20022  For State Contributions to Social Security......$45,951,70023  Total                                        $947,058,900 24    Section 10. The following named sums, or so much thereof 25as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter   HB3906- 3 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 2ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 3Transportation: 4FOR CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION OFFICES5  For Contractual Services.........................28,550,0006  For Travel..........................................626,5007  For Commodities.....................................439,7008  For Printing........................................368,5009  For Equipment.......................................203,00010  For Equipment:11   Purchase of Cars & Trucks..........................540,00012  For Telecommunication Services......................290,00013  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............620,00014    Total                                         $31,637,700 15LUMP SUMS 16    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Road 18Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 19purposes hereinafter named:20  For costs associated with hazardous21   material abatement.................................500,00022  For costs associated with auditing23   consultants for internal24   and external audits..............................2,900,000  HB3906- 4 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For costs associated with process modernization2   implementation of the Department...................200,0003    Total                                          $3,600,000 4    Section 20. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 6Department of Transportation for State Prompt Payment Act 7Interest Costs, including prior years' costs. 8AWARDS AND GRANTS 9    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Road 11Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 12purposes hereinafter named:13  For Tort Claims, including payment pursuant14   to the State Employee Indemnification Act........3,280,00015  For representation and indemnification for16   the Department of Transportation, the Illinois17   State Police and the Secretary of State,18   provided that the representation required19   resulted from the Road Fund portion 20   of their normal operations.........................100,00021   For auto liability payments for the Department of22   Transportation, the Illinois State Police, and the23   Secretary of State, provided that the liability resulted 24   from the Road Fund portion of their normal  HB3906- 5 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1   operations.......................................4,350,0002    Total                                          $7,730,000 3REFUNDS 4    Section 30. The following named amount, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 6Department of Transportation for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named:8  For Refunds..........................................14,100 9    Section 35. The following named sums, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 11named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 12ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 13Transportation: 14FOR BUREAU OF INFORMATION PROCESSING15  For Contractual Services.........................12,755,20016  For Travel...........................................70,00017  For Commodities......................................25,00018  For Equipment........................................20,00019  For Electronic Data Processing...................83,778,40020  For Telecommunication Services....................1,600,00021    Total                                         $98,248,600 22FOR PLANNING AND PROGRAMMING   HB3906- 6 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Section 40. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 3named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department 4of Transportation for the ordinary and contingent expenses of 5the Office of Planning and Programming:6  For Contractual Services............................550,0007  For Travel..........................................160,0008  For Commodities......................................67,3009  For Printing........................................250,00010  For Equipment.......................................618,00011  For Telecommunication Services......................260,00012  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............110,00013    Total                                          $2,015,300 14LUMP SUMS 15    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Road 17Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 18purposes hereinafter named:19  For Planning, Research and Development20   Purposes...........................................250,00021  For metropolitan planning and research purposes as provided 22   by law, provided such amount shall23   not exceed funds to be made24   available from the federal25   government or local sources.....................93,417,000  HB3906- 7 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For metropolitan planning and research2   purposes as provided by law.....................25,523,0003    Total                                        $119,190,000 4    Section 50. The sum of $2,038,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 6Department of Transportation for purchase of computer 7equipment for various law enforcement agencies to provide them 8the capability of submitting crash reports electronically. 9Expenditures may not exceed the amount made available from 10NHTSA for this purpose. 11FOR HIGHWAYS PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION 12    Section 55. The following named sums, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 14named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department 15of Transportation for the ordinary and contingent expenses of 16the Office of Highway Implementation:17  For Contractual Services..........................6,457,90018  For Travel..........................................390,00019  For Commodities.....................................265,90020  For Printing.........................................10,10021  For Equipment.....................................8,250,00022  For Equipment:23   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................9,929,00024  For Telecommunication Services....................4,000,000  HB3906- 8 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............810,0002    Total                                         $30,112,900 3LUMP SUMS 4    Section 60. The following named sums, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Road Fund to the 6Department of Transportation for payments to local governments 7for the following purposes:8  For reimbursement of eligible expenses9   arising from local10   Traffic Signal Maintenance Agreements............5,400,00011  For reimbursement of eligible expenses12   arising from City,13   County, and other State14   Maintenance Agreements..........................16,700,00015    Total                                         $22,100,000 16    Section 65. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 18Department of Transportation for repair of damages by 19motorists to state vehicles and equipment or replacement of 20state vehicles and equipment, provided such amount not exceed 21funds to be made available from collections from claims filed 22by the Department to recover the costs of such damages. 23    Section 70. The sum of $6,500,000, or so much thereof as   HB3906- 9 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 2Department of Transportation for costs associated with the 3State Radio Communications for the 21st Century (STARCOM) 4program. 5    Section 75. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 7Department of Transportation for costs associated with 8Illinois Terrorism Task Force, that consist of approved 9purchases for homeland security provided such expenditures do 10not exceed funds made available by the federal government for 11this purpose. 12    Section 80. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 14Department of Transportation for costs incurred by the 15Department's response to natural disasters, emergencies and 16acts of terrorism that receive Presidential and/or State 17Disaster Declaration status. These costs would include, but 18not be limited to, the Department's fuel costs, cost of 19materials and cost of equipment rentals. This appropriation is 20in addition to the Department's other appropriations for 21District and Central Office operations. 22    Section 85. The sum of $210,000, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the   HB3906- 10 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1Department of Transportation for costs associated with the 2Technology Transfer Center, including the purchase of 3equipment, media initiatives, and training, provided that such 4expenditures do not exceed funds to be made available by the 5federal government for this purpose. 6    Section 90. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 8Department of Transportation for costs associated with highway 9safety media campaigns, provided such amounts do not exceed 10funds to be made available from the federal government. 11    Section 95. The sum of $11,200,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 13Department of Transportation for the IDOT ITS Program. 14    Section 100. The sum of $180,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Transportation Safety 16Highway Hire-back Fund to the Department of Transportation for 17agreements with the Illinois State Police to provide patrol 18officers in highway construction work zones. 19    Section 105. The sum of $1,950,000, or so much there of as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the DUI Prevention and 21Education Fund to the Department of Transportation for 22expenditures, as determined by the DUI Prevention and   HB3906- 11 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1Education Commission, for crash victim programs and materials, 2impaired driving prevention programs, law enforcement support, 3and other DUI-related programs. 4AWARDS AND GRANTS 5    Section 110. The sum of $5,512,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 7Department of Transportation for reimbursement to counties 8participating in the County Engineers Compensation Program for 9salaries in the period agreed upon by the parties without 10regard to state fiscal year. Such reimbursements may not 11exceed funds to be made available from the counties federal 12highway allocations retained by the Department.  13REFUNDS 14    Section 115. The following named amount, or so much 15thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road 16Fund to the Department of Transportation for the objects and 17purposes hereinafter named:18  For Refunds..........................................35,000 19FOR CYCLE RIDER SAFETY 20    Section 120. The following named sums, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 22named, are appropriated from the Cycle Rider Safety Training   HB3906- 12 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 2administration of the Cycle Rider Safety Training Program: 3OPERATIONS4  For Personal Services...............................302,6005  For State Contributions to State6   Employees' Retirement System.......................140,7007  For State Contributions to Social Security...........22,8008  For Group Insurance..................................99,6009  For Contractual Services............................162,80010  For Travel............................................9,70011  For Commodities......................................36,20012    Total                                            $774,400 13LUMP SUMS 14    Section 125. The sum of $4,700,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cycle Rider Safety 16Training Fund to the Department of Transportation for 17reimbursements to State and local universities and colleges 18for Cycle Rider Safety Training Programs. 19    Section 130. The following named sums, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 21named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 22ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 23Transportation:   HB3906- 13 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1FOR BUREAU OF DAY LABOR2  For Contractual Services..........................8,125,0003  For Travel..........................................175,0004  For Commodities.....................................333,0005  For Equipment.......................................704,5006  For Equipment:7   Purchase of Cars and Trucks........................995,2008  For Telecommunication Services.......................60,0009  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............1,650,00010    Total                                         $12,042,700 11    Section 135. The following named sums, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 13named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 14ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 15Transportation: 16DISTRICT 1, SCHAUMBURG OFFICE17  For Contractual Services.........................16,030,40018  For Travel..........................................440,00019  For Commodities..................................16,710,70020  For Equipment.....................................5,150,00021  For Equipment:22   Purchase of Cars and Trucks.....................14,549,20023  For Telecommunication Services....................7,288,500  HB3906- 14 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For Operation of Automotive Equipment........... 25,000,0002    Total                                         $85,168,800 3    Section 140. The following named sums, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 5named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 6ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 7Transportation: 8DISTRICT 2, DIXON OFFICE9  For Contractual Services..........................5,400,00010  For Travel...........................................85,50011  For Commodities...................................8,230,20012  For Equipment.....................................2,380,00013  For Equipment:14   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................5,094,70015  For Telecommunication Services......................327,20016  For Operation of Automotive Equipment............ 9,000,00017    Total                                         $30,517,600 18    Section 145. The following named sums, or so much thereof 19as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 20named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 21ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 22Transportation:   HB3906- 15 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1DISTRICT 3, OTTAWA OFFICE2  For Contractual Services..........................6,195,0003  For Travel...........................................55,0004  For Commodities...................................6,098,5005  For Equipment.....................................2,380,0006  For Equipment:7   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................5,560,0008  For Telecommunication Services......................362,9009  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............8,000,00010    Total                                         $28,651,400 11    Section 150. The following named sums, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 13named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 14ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 15Transportation: 16DISTRICT 4, PEORIA OFFICE17  For Contractual Services..........................5,000,00018  For Travel...........................................50,00019  For Commodities...................................4,172,20020  For Equipment.....................................2,380,00021  For Equipment:22   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................4,457,80023  For Telecommunication Services......................312,70024  For Operation of Automotive Equipment............ 7,750,100  HB3906- 16 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Total                                         $24,122,800 2    Section 155. The following named sums, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 4named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 5ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 6Transportation: 7DISTRICT 5, PARIS OFFICE8  For Contractual Services..........................5,300,0009  For Travel...........................................50,00010  For Commodities...................................3,736,90011  For Equipment.....................................2,380,00012  For Equipment:13   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................4,408,80014  For Telecommunication Services......................332,50015  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............7,000,00016    Total                                         $23,208,200 17    Section 160. The following named sums, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 19named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 20ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 21Transportation: 22DISTRICT 6, SPRINGFIELD OFFICE  HB3906- 17 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For Contractual Services..........................6,874,3002  For Travel...........................................50,0003  For Commodities...................................3,046,4004  For Equipment.....................................2,605,0005  For Equipment:6   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................6,270,4007  For Telecommunication Services......................407,5008  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............8,600,0009    Total                                         $27,853,600 10    Section 165. The following named sums, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 12named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 13ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 14Transportation: 15DISTRICT 7, EFFINGHAM OFFICE16  For Contractual Services..........................5,076,90017  For Travel...........................................53,00018  For Commodities...................................2,809,30019  For Equipment.....................................2,380,00020  For Equipment:21   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................4,874,20022  For Telecommunication Services......................349,30023  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............5,000,00024    Total                                         $20,542,700   HB3906- 18 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Section 170. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 3named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 4ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 5Transportation: 6DISTRICT 8, COLLINSVILLE OFFICE7  For Contractual Services.........................11,179,1008  For Travel...........................................65,0009  For Commodities...................................5,403,10010  For Equipment.....................................3,348,00011  For Equipment:12   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................5,903,00013  For Telecommunication Services......................828,20014  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............9,825,00015    Total                                         $36,551,400 16    Section 175. The following named sums, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 18named, are appropriated from the Road Fund to meet the 19ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 20Transportation: 21DISTRICT 9, CARBONDALE OFFICE22  For Contractual Services..........................5,195,800  HB3906- 19 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For Travel...........................................60,0002  For Commodities...................................2,403,1003  For Equipment.....................................2,380,0004  For Equipment:5   Purchase of Cars and Trucks......................4,237,4006  For Telecommunication Services......................281,9007  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.............5,569,7008    Total                                         $20,127,900 9    Section 180. The following named sums, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, for the objects and purposes hereinafter 11named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and contingent 12expenses of the Department of Transportation: 13FOR AERONAUTICS14For Contractual Services:15  Payable from the Road Fund..........................900,00016  Payable from Air Transportation Revolving Fund......213,20017For Travel:18  Payable from the Road Fund...........................50,00019For Commodities:20  Payable from the Road Fund...........................90,70021  Payable from Aeronautics Fund.........................5,10022For Equipment:23  Payable from the Road Fund..........................157,90024For Telecommunication Services:  HB3906- 20 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  Payable from the Road Fund...........................65,0002For Operation of Automotive Equipment:3  Payable from the Road Fund...........................81,9004    Total                                          $1,563,800 5LUMP SUMS 6    Section 185. The sum of $1,600,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Tax Recovery Fund 8to the Department of Transportation for maintenance and repair 9costs incurred on real property owned by the Department for 10development of an airport in Will County, for applicable 11refunds of security deposits to lessees, and for payments to 12the Will County Treasurer in lieu of leasehold taxes lost due 13to government ownership. 14    Section 190. The sum of $32,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Aviation 16Program Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 17purposes described in Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance 18Act. 19    Section 195. The sum of $9,500,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Sound-Reducing 21Windows and Doors Replacement Fund to the Department of 22Transportation for the purposes described in Section 6z-20.1 23of the State Finance Act.   HB3906- 21 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1REFUNDS 2    Section 200. The following named amount, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the 4Aeronautics Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 5objects and purposes hereinafter named:6  For Refunds.............................................500 7FOR INTERMODAL PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION 8    Section 205. The following named sums, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary for the agencies hereinafter named, are 10appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 11Transportation for the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 12Office of Intermodal Project Implementation:13  For Contractual Services............................654,70014  For Travel...........................................65,00015  For Commodities.......................................4,50016  For Equipment.........................................5,00017  For Telecommunication Services.......................50,00018    Total                                            $779,200 19LUMP SUMS 20    Section 210. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 22Department of Transportation for public transportation 23technical studies.   HB3906- 22 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Section 215. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 3Department of Transportation for costs associated with Safety 4and Security Oversight as set forth in the federal 5transportation bill, as amended. 6    Section 220. The following named sums, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Downstate 8Public Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation 9for operating assistance to provide a portion of the eligible 10operating expenses for the following carriers for the purposes 11stated in the Downstate Public Transportation Act:12Champaign-Urbana Mass Transit District.............53,524,70013Greater Peoria Mass Transit District with 14 Service to Peoria County..........................42,340,70015Rock Island County Metropolitan 16 Mass Transit District.............................33,749,30017Rockford Mass Transit District.....................28,012,50018Springfield Mass Transit District..................27,241,50019Bloomington-Normal Public Transit System with 20  service to McLean County.........................18,186,60021City of Decatur with service to Macon County.......14,196,80022City of Quincy......................................6,689,90023City of Galesburg...................................3,041,60024Stateline Mass Transit District with    HB3906- 23 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1 service to South Beloit............................1,481,5002City of Danville....................................4,866,4003RIDES Mass Transit District with 4 service to Edgar and Clark counties...............15,786,7005South Central Illinois Mass Transit District.......10,168,4006River Valley Metro Mass Transit District............8,976,8007Jackson County Mass Transit District................1,404,4008City of DeKalb......................................8,293,3009City of Macomb......................................4,199,00010Shawnee Mass Transit District.......................4,469,30011St. Clair County Transit District..................99,636,70012West Central Mass Transit District 13 with service to Cass and Schuyler Counties.........2,272,50014Monroe-Randolph Transit District....................1,728,10015Madison County Mass Transit District...............39,701,10016Bond County..........................................814,900 17Bureau County with service to Putnam County.........1,532,20018Coles County........................................1,236,40019City of Freeport with service  20 to Stephenson County...............................1,631,90021Henry County..........................................718,40022Jo Daviess County...................................1,180,20023Kankakee County.....................................1,279,00024Piatt County with service to DeWitt County..........1,160,60025Shelby County with service to Christian County......1,697,70026Tazewell County.....................................1,317,700  HB3906- 24 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1CRIS Rural Mass Transit District....................1,581,3002Kendall County......................................3,060,1003Woodford County.......................................578,5004Reagan Mass Transit District........................2,240,4005Whiteside County....................................1,167,3006Champaign County....................................1,125,6007Boone County..........................................235,7008DeKalb County.......................................1,540,8009Grundy County.........................................834,60010Warren County with service to Mercer County...........845,00011Rock Island County....................................338,20012Hancock County........................................342,10013Macoupin County.....................................1,129,80014Fulton County.........................................518,80015Effingham County......................................778,00016City of Ottawa with service to LaSalle County.......2,178,60017Carroll County........................................650,90018Logan County with service to Mason County.............754,60019Sangamon County with service to Menard County.........779,50020Jersey County with service to Greene and 21 Calhoun Counties.................................... 701,50022Marshall County with service to Stark County......... 311,10023Douglas County........................................251,00024Winnebago County......................................798,80025Livingston County with service to Ford and  26 Iroquois Counties....................................898,700  HB3906- 25 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Total                                        $466,177,700 2    Section 225. The sum of $4,951,200, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Downstate Public 4Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation for 5audit adjustments in accordance with Sections 2-7 and 2-15 of 6the Downstate Public Transportation Act, including prior 7years' costs. 8    Section 230. The sum of $520,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Mass Transit 10Trust Fund to the Department of Transportation for federal 11reimbursement of costs associated with Safety and Security 12Oversight as set forth in the federal transportation bill, as 13amended. 14    Section 235. The sum of $1,540,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Mass 16Transit Trust Fund to the Department of Transportation for 17federal reimbursement of transit studies as provided by the 18federal transportation bill, as amended. 19GRANTS AND AWARDS 20    Section 240. The sum of $594,000,000, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public 22Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation for   HB3906- 26 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1the purpose stated in Section 4.09 of the Regional 2Transportation Authority Act. 3    Section 245. The sum of $100,000,000, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public 5Transportation Fund to the Department of Transportation for 6making a grant to the Regional Transportation Authority for 7Additional Financial Assistance to be used for its purposes as 8provided in the Regional Transportation Authority Act, but in 9no event shall this amount exceed the amount provided for in 10Sections 4.09 (c-5) and 4.09 (d) with respect to Strategic 11Capital Improvement bonds issued by the Regional 12Transportation Authority pursuant to the Regional 13Transportation Authority Act. 14    Section 250. The sum of $23,067,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 16Department of Transportation for grants to the Regional 17Transportation Authority intended to reimburse the Service 18Boards for providing reduced fares on mass transportation 19services for students, handicapped persons, and the elderly, 20to be allocated proportionally among the Service Boards based 21upon actual costs incurred by each Service Board for such 22reduced fares. 23    Section 255. The sum of $11,500,000, or so much thereof as   HB3906- 27 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 2Department of Transportation for making a grant to the 3Regional Transportation Authority for the funding of the 4Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA) paratransit 5services and for other costs and services. 6    Section 260. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 8Department of Transportation for costs associated with the 9long-term heavy overhauls of locomotives. 10    Section 265. The sum of $76,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 12Department of Transportation for funding the State's share of 13intercity rail passenger service and making necessary 14expenditures for services and other program improvements. 15FOR HIGHWAY SAFETY 16    Section 270. The following named sums, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary for the agencies hereinafter named, are 18appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 19Transportation for implementation of the Illinois Highway 20Safety Program under provisions of the National Highway Safety 21Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic Safety Programs 22of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 231982, as amended, and other federal highway safety initiatives   HB3906- 28 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1as provided by law: 2FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION3  For Contractual Services............................225,6004  For Travel...........................................35,0005  For Commodities......................................23,7006  For Printing.........................................43,7007  For Equipment.............................................08  For Telecommunication Services............................09  For Operation of Automotive Equipment.....................010    Total                                            $328,000 11FOR THE ILLINOIS CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION AUTHORITY12  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 13Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 14Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 15Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 16Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 17safety initiatives as provided by law.................138,400 18FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE19  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 20Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 21Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 22Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 23Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway   HB3906- 29 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1safety initiatives as provided by law.............. 1,823,100 2FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH3  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 4Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 5Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 6Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 7Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 8safety initiatives as provided by law.................736,500 9FOR THE ILLINOIS STATE POLICE10  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 11Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 12Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 13Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 14Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 15safety initiatives as provided by law.............. 7,497,300 16FOR THE ILLINOIS LAW ENFORCEMENT17TRAINING STANDARDS BOARD18  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 19Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 20Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 21Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 22Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 23safety initiatives as provided by law.................710,000   HB3906- 30 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1FOR THE ADMISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE ILLINOIS COURTS2  For costs associated with implementation of the Illinois 3Highway Safety Program under provisions of the National 4Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol Traffic 5Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface Transportation 6Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other federal highway 7safety initiatives as provided by law.................120,8008  Total                                           $11,354,100 9LUMP SUM AWARDS AND GRANTS 10    Section 275. The sum of $15,900,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 12Department of Transportation for local highway safety grants 13to county and municipal governments, state and private 14universities and other private entities for implementation of 15the Illinois Highway Safety Program under provisions of the 16National Highway Safety Act of 1966, as amended, and Alcohol 17Traffic Safety Programs of Title XXIII of the Surface 18Transportation Assistance Act of 1982, as amended, and other 19federal highway safety initiatives as provided by law. 20FOR COMMERICIAL MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY 21    Section 280. The following named sums, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary for the agencies hereinafter named, are 23appropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of   HB3906- 31 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1Transportation for implementation of the Commercial Motor 2Vehicle Safety Program under provisions of Title IV of the 3Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 1982, as amended: 4FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION5  For Contractual Services............................340,0006  For Travel..........................................278,1007  For Commodities......................................62,6008  For Equipment.......................................906,1009  For Equipment:10  Purchase of Cars and Trucks.........................357,00011  For Telecommunication Services.......................45,00012  For Operation of Automotive Equipment...............207,50013    Total                                          $2,196,300 14FOR THE ILLINOIS STATE POLICE15  For costs associated with implementation of the Commercial 16Motor Vehicle Safety Program under provisions of Title IV of 17the Surface Transportation Assistance Act18of 1982, as amended................................17,107,10019  Total                                         $19,303,400 20    Section 285. The sum of $350,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 22Department of Transportation for costs associated with motor 23carrier safety media campaigns, provided such amounts do not   HB3906- 32 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1exceed funds to be made available from the federal government. 2MOTOR FUEL TAX ADMINISTRATION 3    Section 290. The following named sums, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, are appropriated from the Motor Fuel Tax 5Fund to the Department of Transportation for the ordinary and 6contingent expenses incident to the operations and functions 7of administering the provisions of the Illinois Highway Code, 8relating to use of Motor Fuel Tax Funds by the counties, 9municipalities, road districts and townships: 10OPERATIONS11  For Personal Services............................13,698,60012  For State Contributions to State13   Employees' Retirement System.....................6,367,90014  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,016,20015  For Group Insurance...............................4,183,20016  For Contractual Services.............................77,60017  For Travel...........................................30,00018  For Commodities.......................................2,00019  For Printing.........................................13,00020  For Equipment.........................................3,50021  For Telecommunication Services.......................13,00022  For Operation of Automotive Equipment................13,00023    Total                                         $25,418,000   HB3906- 33 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Section 295. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as are available for distribution in accordance with Section 8 3of the Motor Fuel Tax Law, are appropriated to the Department 4of Transportation for the purposes stated: 5DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS6Payable from the Motor Fuel Tax Counties Fund:7  For apportioning, allotting, and paying8   as provided by law to Counties.................205,983,8009Payable from the Motor Fuel Tax Municipalities Fund:10  For apportioning, allotting, and paying11   as provided by law to Municipalities...........287,256,20012Payable from the Motor Fuel Tax Townships and Road Districts 13Fund:14  For apportioning, allotting, and paying as provided15   by law to Counties for Distribution to16   Road Districts..................................93,385,00017    Total                                        $586,625,000 18    Section 300. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as are available for distribution in accordance with 20Section 8b of the Motor Fuel Tax Law, are appropriated from the 21Transportation Renewal Fund to the Department of 22Transportation for the purposes stated: 23DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS  HB3906- 34 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For apportioning, allotting, and paying2   as provided by law:3    To Counties...................................202,837,0004    To Municipalities.............................284,470,6005    To Counties for Distribution to6     Road Districts................................92,062,6007    Total                                        $579,370,200 8    Section 305. No contract shall be entered into or 9obligation incurred or any expenditure made from an 10appropriation herein made in:11Section 245 SCIP II Debt Service 12of this Article until after the purpose and the amount of such 13expenditure has been approved in writing by the Governor. 14  Total, This Article........................$4,180,114,100 15ARTICLE 2 16DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION17FOR CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION 18    Section 5. The sum of $3,271,644, or so much thereof as may 19be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 20on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and reappropriation 21heretofore made in Article 73, Section 15 and Article 74, 22Section 5 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is   HB3906- 35 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 2Transportation for costs associated with hazardous material 3abatement. 4    Section 10. The sum of $11,133,643, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 6business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 7reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 15 and 8Article 74, Section 10 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 9reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 10Transportation for costs associated with auditing consultants 11for internal and external audits. 12    Section 15. The sum of $1,573,155, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 14business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 15reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 15 and 16Article 74, Section 15 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 17reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 18Transportation for costs associated with process modernization 19implementation of the Department. 20    Section 20. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation heretofore 23made in Article 73, Section 20 of Public Act 103-0589, as   HB3906- 36 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1amended, is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the 2Department of Transportation for costs associated with an 3efficiency study. 4FOR PLANNING AND PROGRAMMING 5    Section 25. The sum of $2,038,871, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 7business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 8reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 45 and 9Article 74, Section 20 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 10reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 11Transportation for Planning, Research and Development 12purposes. 13    Section 30. The sum of $120,938,810, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 15business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 16reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 45 and 17Article 74, Section 25 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 18reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 19Transportation for metropolitan planning and research purposes 20as provided by law, provided such amounts shall not exceed 21funds to be made available from the federal government or 22local sources. 23    Section 35. The sum of $53,735,669, or so much thereof as   HB3906- 37 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 2business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 3reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 45 and 4Article 74, Section 30 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 5reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 6Transportation for metropolitan planning and research purposes 7as provided by law. 8    Section 40. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 10business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation heretofore 11made in Article 73, Section 50 of Public Act 103-0589, as 12amended, is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the 13Department of Transportation for costs incurred as directed by 14the Blue-Ribbon Commission for strategic advisory services and 15support. 16FOR HIGHWAY PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION 17    Section 45. The sum of $37,709,149, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 19business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriations and 20reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 60, and 21Article 74, Section 35, of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 22reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 23Transportation for reimbursements of eligible expenses arising 24from Local Traffic Signal Maintenance Agreements and   HB3906- 38 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1reimbursements of eligible expenses arising from City, County 2and other State Maintenance Agreements. 3    Section 50. The sum of $5,894,668, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 5business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 6reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 65 and 7Article 74, Section 40 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 8reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 9Transportation for repair of damages by motorists to state 10vehicles and equipment or replacement of state vehicles and 11equipment, provided such amount does not exceed funds to be 12made available from collections from claims filed by the 13Department to recover the costs of such damages. 14    Section 55. The sum of $9,199,593, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 16business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 17reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 70 and 18Article 74, Section 45 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 19reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 20Transportation for costs associated with the State Radio 21Communications for the 21st Century (STARCOM) program. 22    Section 60. The sum of $469,789, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business   HB3906- 39 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and reappropriation 2heretofore made in Article 73, Section 75 and Article 74, 3Section 50 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 4reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 5Transportation for costs associated with Illinois Terrorism 6Task Force, that consist of approved purchases for homeland 7security provided such expenditures do not exceed funds made 8available by the federal government for this purpose. 9    Section 65. The sum of $529,398, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 11on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and reappropriation 12heretofore made in Article 73, Section 85 and Article 74, 13Section 55 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 14reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 15Transportation for costs associated with the Technology 16Transfer Center, including the purchase of equipment, media 17initiatives and training, provided that such expenditures do 18not exceed funds to be made available by the federal 19government for this purpose. 20    Section 70. The sum of $6,981,822, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 23reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 90 and 24Article 74, Section 60 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is   HB3906- 40 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 2Transportation for costs associated with highway safety media 3campaigns, provided such amounts do not exceed funds to be 4made available from the federal government. 5    Section 75. The sum of $977,592, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of business 7on June 30, 2025, from the reappropriation heretofore made in 8Article 74, Section 65 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 9reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 10Transportation for costs associated with identifying and 11evaluating current state of work zone activity data, and 12proposing changes to create a pilot data set that is compliant 13with federal standards under the Work Zone Data Exchanges 14(WZDx) to improve work zone safety, including prior incurred 15costs. Amounts not to exceed funds to be made available from 16the federal SMART grant. 17    Section 80. The sum of $34,175,781, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 19business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 20reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 95 and 21Article 74, Section 70 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 22reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 23Transportation for the IDOT ITS program.   HB3906- 41 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Section 85. The sum of $21,208,616, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 3business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 4reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 125 and 5Article 74, Section 75 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 6reappropriated from the Cycle Rider Safety Training Fund to 7the Department of Transportation for reimbursements to State 8and local universities and colleges for Cycle Rider Safety 9Training Programs. 10FOR AERONAUTICS 11    Section 90. The sum of $59,032,534, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 13business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 14reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 190 and 15Article 74, Section 85, of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 16reappropriated from the State Aviation Program Fund to the 17Department of Transportation for the purposes described in 18Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance Act. 19    Section 95. The sum of $42,642,634, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 21business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 22reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 195 and 23Article 74, Section 90, of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 24reappropriated from the Sound-Reducing Windows and Doors   HB3906- 42 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1Replacement Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 2purposes described in Section 6z-20.1 of the State Finance 3Act. 4FOR HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAM 5    Section 100. The sum of $33,928,131, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 7business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 8reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 280, 9and Article 74 Section 95 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 10is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 11Transportation for Illinois Highway Safety Program, local 12highway safety projects by county and municipal governments, 13state and private universities and other private entities. 14    Section 105. The sum of $1,050,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 16business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 17reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 290, 18and Article 74 Section 100 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 19is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 20Transportation for cost associated with motor carrier safety 21media campaigns, provided such amounts do not exceed funds to 22be made available from the federal government. 23FOR INTERMODAL PROJECT IMPLEMENTATION   HB3906- 43 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1    Section 110. The sum of $1,082,931, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 3business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 4reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 210 and 5Article 74, Section 105 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 6reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 7Transportation for public transportation technical studies. 8    Section 115. The sum of $3,699,952, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 10business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 11reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 230 and 12Article 74, Section 110 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 13reappropriated from the Federal Mass Transit Trust Fund to the 14Department of Transportation for federal reimbursement of 15costs associated with Safety and Security Oversight as set 16forth in the federal transportation bill, as amended. 17    Section 120. The sum of $6,893,062, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 19business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 20reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 235 and 21Article 74, Section 115 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 22reappropriated from the Federal Mass Transit Trust Fund to the 23Department of Transportation for federal reimbursement of 24transit studies as provided by the federal transportation   HB3906- 44 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1bill, as amended. 2    Section 125. The sum of $3,271,111, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 4business on June 30, 2025, from the reappropriation heretofore 5made in Article 74, Section 120 of Public Act 103-0589, as 6amended, is reappropriated from the Federal Mass Transit Trust 7Fund to the Department of Transportation for support to rural 8transit districts as provided by the CARES Act, including 9prior incurred costs. 10    Section 130. The sum of $14,500,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, and remains unexpended, at the close of 12business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriation and 13reappropriation heretofore made in Article 73, Section 265 and 14Article 74, Section 125 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, is 15reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 16Transportation for costs associated with the long-term heavy 17overhauls of locomotives. 18FOR EQUIPMENT 19    Section 135. The following named sums, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 21business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriations and 22reappropriations heretofore made in Article 73, Sections 40, 2355, 130, 135, 140, 145, 150, 155, 160, 165, 170, 175 and 285   HB3906- 45 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1and Article 74 Section 130 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 2is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the Department of 3Transportation for equipment as follows:4Planning & Programming5  For Equipment.......................................466,9576Highways Project Implementation7  For Equipment....................................26,445,0248Day Labor9  For Equipment.....................................1,405,37010District 1, Schaumburg Office11  For Equipment....................................12,967,28912District 2, Dixon Office13  For Equipment.....................................3,903,62914District 3, Ottawa Office15  For Equipment.....................................5,867,38916District 4, Peoria Office17  For Equipment.....................................4,509,11718District 5, Paris Office19  For Equipment.....................................3,488,27320District 6, Springfield Office21  For Equipment.....................................4,901,78022District 7, Effingham Office23  For Equipment.....................................5,892,69024District 8, Collinsville Office25  For Equipment.....................................5,219,26226District 9, Carbondale Office   HB3906- 46 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1  For Equipment.....................................3,616,6962Commercial Motor Carrier Safety 3  For Equipment.....................................2,240,4864    Total                                         $80,923,962 5    Section 140. The following named sums, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 7business on June 30, 2025, from the appropriations and 8reappropriations heretofore made in Article 73, Sections 10, 955, 130, 135, 140, 145, 150, 155, 160, 165, 170, 175, and 285 10and Article 74, Section 135 of Public Act 103-0589, as 11amended, is reappropriated from the Road Fund to the 12Department of Transportation for the purchase of Cars and 13Trucks as follows:14Central Administration15  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks.....................978,09816Highways Project Implementation17  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................16,044,52018Day Labor19  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................3,827,975 20District 1, Schaumburg Office21  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................38,059,10822District 2, Dixon Office23  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................16,747,15224District 3, Ottawa Office25  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................16,292,738  HB3906- 47 -OMB104 00049 STV 10049 b1District 4, Peoria Office2  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................14,868,0143District 5, Paris Office4  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................12,286,4215District 6, Springfield Office6  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................11,972,8087District 7, Effingham Office8  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................12,874,8769District 8, Collinsville Office10  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................17,296,99111District 9, Carbondale Office 12  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks..................10,952,69213Commercial Motor Carrier Safety14  For Purchase of Cars and Trucks.....................485,81015    Total                                        $172,687,203 16  Total, This Article..........................$735,549,720 17    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182025.